Colorado, session 2026A, SB013.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-6-201, amend (1)
introductory portion and (1.5) introductory portion as follows:
18-6-201. Bigamy.
(1) Any A married person who, while still married, marries OR
enters into a civil union or cohabits in this state with another person
commits bigamy, unless as an affirmative defense it appears that at the time
of the cohabitation, subsequent marriage or subsequent civil union:
(1.5) Any A person who is a partner in a civil union, while still
legally in a civil union, who marries OR enters into another civil union or
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

cohabits in the state with another person other than a current partner in a
civil union commits bigamy, unless as an affirmative defense it appears that
at the time of the cohabitation or subsequent marriage or subsequent civil
union:
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 18-6-203 as
follows:
18-6-203. Definitions.
As used in section 18-6-201, "cohabitation" means to live together
under the representation of being married.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-013

and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-013